Nebraska, session 109, LB427.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB427 LB427
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Applicant means a parent, guardian, or educational decisionmaker
of an enrolled student, or an enrolled student that is nineteen years of
age or an emancipated minor, that applies for an educational savings
account pursuant to this section;
(b) Educational decisionmaker has the same meaning as in section
79-530;
(c) Educational savings account means an educational savings account
established by the State Treasurer for an enrolled student pursuant to
this section;
(d) Enrolled student means a student in kindergarten through twelfth
grade enrolled in an approved or accredited public, private,
denominational, or parochial school in this state for such school year;
and
(e)(i) Qualified educational expenses includes:
(A) Tuition and fees;
(B) Textbooks, software, and required course materials;
(C) Fees or payments for educational therapies, including tutoring
or cognitive skills training;
(D) Educational materials and support services, including the cost
of paraprofessionals and assistants, for enrolled students with a
disability as defined in section 79-1118.01 or an enrolled student
receiving services under a plan pursuant to the requirements of section
504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. 794; and
(E) Any other academic or learning material approved by the State
Board of Education.
(ii) Qualified educational expenses does not include:
(A) Transportation costs for the enrolled student;
(B) The cost of food or refreshments consumed by the enrolled
student;
(C) The cost of clothing for the enrolled student; or
-2-

LB427 LB427
2025 2025
(D) The cost of disposable materials, including, but not limited to,
paper, notebooks, pencils, pens, and art supplies.
(2)(a) The State Board of Education shall adopt a list of qualified
educational expenses and make such list available on the website of the
State Department of Education.
(b) An applicant may appeal to the State Board of Education relating
to the list of qualified educational expenses or to have an educational
expense added to the list of qualified educational expenses.
(3) There is hereby created the Student Savings Account Support
Fund. The fund shall be administered by the State Treasurer or a third-
party manager under the supervision of the State Treasurer and shall be
used to provide educational savings account payments pursuant to this
section. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(4)(a) Beginning with the 2026-27 school year, as part of the
enrollment process for any student in kindergarten through twelfth grade
at an approved or accredited public, private, denominational, or
parochial school in this state, a parent, legal guardian, or educational
decisionmaker of a student or the student, if such student is nineteen
years of age or older or an emancipated minor, shall receive information
on applying for an educational savings account in order to receive an
educational account payment from the state pursuant to this section. Such
parent, guardian, educational decisionmaker, or enrolled student may
apply for such account on forms and in a manner prescribed by the State
Treasurer.
(b) An applicant shall reapply each year in order to receive an
educational savings account payment for each subsequent school year. An
enrolled student may only receive one educational savings account payment
per school year. Any money in the educational savings account shall be
used, retained, or transferred in accordance with subsection (6) of this
-3-

LB427 LB427
2025 2025
section.
(5) Beginning July 1, 2026, the State Treasurer shall establish a
separate educational savings account for each enrolled student for whom
an application is received as provided in subsection (4) of this section.
Each fiscal year the State Treasurer or a third-party manager under the
supervision of the State Treasurer shall transfer one thousand five
hundred dollars from the Student Savings Account Support Fund into the
educational savings account of each such enrolled student as an
educational savings account payment. The payment shall be available in
the educational savings account of each enrolled student by July 15 of
each year or thirty days after submission of the application, whichever
is later. The educational savings account shall be made available for
viewing and use by the applicant.
(6) The applicant may withdraw money from the educational savings
account for use on qualified educational expenses. The money in the
educational savings account is nontransferable and shall be used
exclusively to pay for qualified educational expenses of the enrolled
student for whom the account is established. Such money shall first be
used for tuition and fees prior to use for other qualified educational
expenses. The applicant shall retain access to the account as long as the
student for whom the account is created remains an enrolled student, and
such account shall follow the student for continued use if a student
transfers to a different approved or accredited public, private,
denominational, or parochial school within this state. The educational
savings account shall terminate and the funds shall be transferred to the
General Fund if the student no longer qualifies as an enrolled student,
upon the enrolled student's graduation from high school, or in the event
of the death of the enrolled student. The State Treasurer or third-party
manager under the supervision of the State Treasurer may require receipts
to verify that any money withdrawn was used to pay for qualified
educational expenses. An approved or accredited public, private,
-4-

LB427 LB427
2025 2025
denominational, or parochial school or other provider of qualified
educational expenses that knowingly accepts payment from an applicant
using funds from an enrolled student's educational savings account shall
not refund, rebate, or share any portion of such payment with the
applicant.
(7) In order to prevent fraud and theft from educational savings
accounts of enrolled students, the State Treasurer shall monitor such
accounts, investigate suspicious activity, and conduct random audits of
such accounts. Whenever the State Treasurer determines that money from an
educational savings account has been used for purposes other than
qualified educational expenses, the State Treasurer shall conduct an
interview with the applicant or any other person suspected of committing
an act of fraud or theft in connection with an account. If the State
Treasurer determines that an act of fraud or theft has been committed,
the offense shall be reported to the Nebraska State Patrol for
investigation. If the Nebraska State Patrol determines that a crime has
been committed, the offender shall be charged with the appropriate
offense under Nebraska law. In addition, the offender shall be required
to pay restitution for the amount taken, and such money shall be
deposited into the educational savings account from which it was taken.
(8) This section shall not be construed to (a) expand the authority
of the state or any political subdivision of the state over any private,
denominational, or parochial school or (b) require any approved or
accredited private, denominational, or parochial school to modify its
academic standards for admission to receive payment from a parent, legal
guardian, or enrolled student using funds from an educational savings
account pursuant to this section.
(9) The State Board of Education may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out this section.
-5-